Washington statutes.
RCW 33.46.090

Assets, liabilities, etc., vested in association upon conversion.

Upon a conversion being consummated all assets, rights and properties of the bank shall vest in and be the property of the association and all liabilities, debts, and obligations of the bank shall be the liabilities, debts, and obligations of the association and any right can be enforced by or against the association the same as it could have been enforced by or against the bank if the conversion had not occurred.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 83 s 9.]